hunspell/kk_KZ.modified.aff
SFX c N 54
SFX c 0 дарымыз [аоуұыэ]ж sf:дарымыз:0
SFX c 0 дарымыз [аоуұыэ]з sf:дарымыз:0
SFX c 0 дарымыз [аоуұыэ]л sf:дарымыз:0
SFX c 0 дарымыз [аоуұыэ]м sf:дарымыз:0
SFX c 0 дарымыз [аоуұыэ]н sf:дарымыз:0
SFX c 0 дарымыз [аоуұыэ]ң sf:дарымыз:0
SFX c 0 деріміз [әеёиөүіюя]ж sf:деріміз:0
SFX c 0 деріміз [әеёиөүіюя]з sf:деріміз:0
SFX c 0 деріміз [әеёиөүіюя]л sf:деріміз:0
SFX c 0 деріміз [әеёиөүіюя]м sf:деріміз:0
SFX c 0 деріміз [әеёиөүіюя]н sf:деріміз:0
SFX c 0 деріміз [әеёиөүіюя]ң sf:деріміз:0
SFX c 0 ларымыз [аоуұыэ] sf:ларымыз:0
SFX c 0 ларымыз [аоуұыэ]й sf:ларымыз:0
SFX c 0 ларымыз [аоуұыэ]р sf:ларымыз:0
SFX c 0 ларымыз [аоуұыэ]у sf:ларымыз:0
SFX c 0 леріміз [әеёиөүіюя] sf:леріміз:0
SFX c 0 леріміз [әеёиөүіюя]й sf:леріміз:0
SFX c 0 леріміз [әеёиөүіюя]р sf:леріміз:0
SFX c 0 леріміз [әеёиөүіюя]у sf:леріміз:0
SFX c 0 тарымыз [аоуұыэ]б sf:тарымыз:0
SFX c 0 тарымыз [аоуұыэ]в sf:тарымыз:0
SFX c 0 тарымыз [аоуұыэ]г sf:тарымыз:0
SFX c 0 тарымыз [аоуұыэ]ғ sf:тарымыз:0
SFX c 0 тарымыз [аоуұыэ]д sf:тарымыз:0
SFX c 0 тарымыз [аоуұыэ]к sf:тарымыз:0
SFX c 0 тарымыз [аоуұыэ]қ sf:тарымыз:0
SFX c 0 тарымыз [аоуұыэ]һ sf:тарымыз:0
SFX c 0 тарымыз [аоуұыэ]п sf:тарымыз:0
SFX c 0 тарымыз [аоуұыэ]с sf:тарымыз:0
SFX c 0 тарымыз [аоуұыэ]т sf:тарымыз:0
SFX c 0 тарымыз [аоуұыэ]ф sf:тарымыз:0
SFX c 0 тарымыз [аоуұыэ]х sf:тарымыз:0
SFX c 0 тарымыз [аоуұыэ]ц sf:тарымыз:0
SFX c 0 тарымыз [аоуұыэ]ч sf:тарымыз:0
SFX c 0 тарымыз [аоуұыэ]ш sf:тарымыз:0
SFX c 0 тарымыз [аоуұыэ]щ sf:тарымыз:0
SFX c 0 теріміз [әеёиөүіюя]б sf:теріміз:0
SFX c 0 теріміз [әеёиөүіюя]в sf:теріміз:0
SFX c 0 теріміз [әеёиөүіюя]г sf:теріміз:0
SFX c 0 теріміз [әеёиөүіюя]ғ sf:теріміз:0
SFX c 0 теріміз [әеёиөүіюя]д sf:теріміз:0
SFX c 0 теріміз [әеёиөүіюя]к sf:теріміз:0
SFX c 0 теріміз [әеёиөүіюя]қ sf:теріміз:0
SFX c 0 теріміз [әеёиөүіюя]һ sf:теріміз:0
SFX c 0 теріміз [әеёиөүіюя]п sf:теріміз:0
SFX c 0 теріміз [әеёиөүіюя]с sf:теріміз:0
SFX c 0 теріміз [әеёиөүіюя]т sf:теріміз:0
SFX c 0 теріміз [әеёиөүіюя]ф sf:теріміз:0
SFX c 0 теріміз [әеёиөүіюя]х sf:теріміз:0
SFX c 0 теріміз [әеёиөүіюя]ц sf:теріміз:0
SFX c 0 теріміз [әеёиөүіюя]ч sf:теріміз:0
SFX c 0 теріміз [әеёиөүіюя]ш sf:теріміз:0
SFX c 0 теріміз [әеёиөүіюя]щ sf:теріміз:0
SFX D N 54
SFX D 0 ің [^аоуұыэ]т sf:ің:0
SFX D 0 ің [әеёиөүіюя]б sf:ің:0
SFX D 0 ің [әеёиөүіюя]в sf:ің:0
SFX D 0 ің [әеёиөүіюя]г sf:ің:0
SFX D 0 ің [әеёиөүіюя]ғ sf:ің:0
SFX D 0 ің [әеёиөүіюя]д sf:ің:0
SFX D 0 ің [әеёиөүіюя]ж sf:ің:0
SFX D 0 ің [әеёиөүіюя]з sf:ің:0
SFX D 0 ің [әеёиөүіюя]й sf:ің:0
SFX D 0 ің [әеёиөүіюя]к sf:ің:0
SFX D 0 ің [әеёиөүіюя]қ sf:ің:0
SFX D 0 ің [әеёиөүіюя]л sf:ің:0
SFX D 0 ің [әеёиөүіюя]м sf:ің:0
SFX D 0 ің [әеёиөүіюя]н sf:ің:0
SFX D 0 ің [әеёиөүіюя]ң sf:ің:0
SFX D 0 ің [әеёиөүіюя]һ sf:ің:0
SFX D 0 ің [әеёиөүіюя]п sf:ің:0
SFX D 0 ің [әеёиөүіюя]р sf:ің:0
SFX D 0 ің [әеёиөүіюя]с sf:ің:0
SFX D 0 ің [әеёиөүіюя]у sf:ің:0
SFX D 0 ің [әеёиөүіюя]ф sf:ің:0
SFX D 0 ің [әеёиөүіюя]х sf:ің:0
SFX D 0 ің [әеёиөүіюя]ц sf:ің:0
SFX D 0 ің [әеёиөүіюя]ч sf:ің:0
SFX D 0 ің [әеёиөүіюя]ш sf:ің:0
SFX D 0 ің [әеёиөүіюя]щ sf:ің:0
SFX D 0 ң [аоұыэәеёиөүіюя] sf:ң:0
SFX D 0 ың [аоуұыэ]б sf:ың:0
SFX D 0 ың [аоуұыэ]в sf:ың:0
SFX D 0 ың [аоуұыэ]г sf:ың:0
SFX D 0 ың [аоуұыэ]ғ sf:ың:0
SFX D 0 ың [аоуұыэ]д sf:ың:0
SFX D 0 ың [аоуұыэ]ж sf:ың:0
SFX D 0 ың [аоуұыэ]з sf:ың:0
SFX D 0 ың [аоуұыэ]й sf:ың:0
SFX D 0 ың [аоуұыэ]к sf:ың:0
SFX D 0 ың [аоуұыэ]қ sf:ың:0
SFX D 0 ың [аоуұыэ]л sf:ың:0
SFX D 0 ың [аоуұыэ]м sf:ың:0
SFX D 0 ың [аоуұыэ]н sf:ың:0
SFX D 0 ың [аоуұыэ]ң sf:ың:0
SFX D 0 ың [аоуұыэ]һ sf:ың:0
SFX D 0 ың [аоуұыэ]п sf:ың:0
SFX D 0 ың [аоуұыэ]р sf:ың:0
SFX D 0 ың [аоуұыэ]с sf:ың:0
SFX D 0 ың [аоуұыэ]т sf:ың:0
SFX D 0 ың [аоуұыэ]ф sf:ың:0
SFX D 0 ың [аоуұыэ]х sf:ың:0
SFX D 0 ың [аоуұыэ]ц sf:ың:0
SFX D 0 ың [аоуұыэ]ч sf:ың:0
SFX D 0 ың [аоуұыэ]ш sf:ың:0
SFX D 0 ың [аоуұыэ]щ sf:ың:0
SFX D 0 ың [аоұыэ]у sf:ың:0
SFX D 0 ың у sf:ың:0
SFX d N 54
SFX d 0 дарың [аоуұыэ]ж sf:дарың:0
SFX d 0 дарың [аоуұыэ]з sf:дарың:0
SFX d 0 дарың [аоуұыэ]л sf:дарың:0
SFX d 0 дарың [аоуұыэ]м sf:дарың:0
SFX d 0 дарың [аоуұыэ]н sf:дарың:0
SFX d 0 дарың [аоуұыэ]ң sf:дарың:0
SFX d 0 дерің [әеёиөүіюя]ж sf:дерің:0
SFX d 0 дерің [әеёиөүіюя]з sf:дерің:0
SFX d 0 дерің [әеёиөүіюя]л sf:дерің:0
SFX d 0 дерің [әеёиөүіюя]м sf:дерің:0
SFX d 0 дерің [әеёиөүіюя]н sf:дерің:0
SFX d 0 дерің [әеёиөүіюя]ң sf:дерің:0
SFX d 0 ларың [аоуұыэ] sf:ларың:0
SFX d 0 ларың [аоуұыэ]й sf:ларың:0
SFX d 0 ларың [аоуұыэ]р sf:ларың:0
SFX d 0 ларың [аоуұыэ]у sf:ларың:0
SFX d 0 лерің [әеёиөүіюя] sf:лерің:0
SFX d 0 лерің [әеёиөүіюя]й sf:лерің:0
SFX d 0 лерің [әеёиөүіюя]р sf:лерің:0
SFX d 0 лерің [әеёиөүіюя]у sf:лерің:0
SFX d 0 тарың [аоуұыэ]б sf:тарың:0
SFX d 0 тарың [аоуұыэ]в sf:тарың:0
SFX d 0 тарың [аоуұыэ]г sf:тарың:0
SFX d 0 тарың [аоуұыэ]ғ sf:тарың:0
SFX d 0 тарың [аоуұыэ]д sf:тарың:0
SFX d 0 тарың [аоуұыэ]к sf:тарың:0
SFX d 0 тарың [аоуұыэ]қ sf:тарың:0
SFX d 0 тарың [аоуұыэ]һ sf:тарың:0
SFX d 0 тарың [аоуұыэ]п sf:тарың:0
SFX d 0 тарың [аоуұыэ]с sf:тарың:0
SFX d 0 тарың [аоуұыэ]т sf:тарың:0
SFX d 0 тарың [аоуұыэ]ф sf:тарың:0
SFX d 0 тарың [аоуұыэ]х sf:тарың:0
SFX d 0 тарың [аоуұыэ]ц sf:тарың:0
SFX d 0 тарың [аоуұыэ]ч sf:тарың:0
SFX d 0 тарың [аоуұыэ]ш sf:тарың:0
SFX d 0 тарың [аоуұыэ]щ sf:тарың:0
SFX d 0 терің [әеёиөүіюя]б sf:терің:0
SFX d 0 терің [әеёиөүіюя]в sf:терің:0
SFX d 0 терің [әеёиөүіюя]г sf:терің:0
SFX d 0 терің [әеёиөүіюя]ғ sf:терің:0
SFX d 0 терің [әеёиөүіюя]д sf:терің:0
SFX d 0 терің [әеёиөүіюя]к sf:терің:0
SFX d 0 терің [әеёиөүіюя]қ sf:терің:0
SFX d 0 терің [әеёиөүіюя]һ sf:терің:0
SFX d 0 терің [әеёиөүіюя]п sf:терің:0
SFX d 0 терің [әеёиөүіюя]с sf:терің:0
SFX d 0 терің [әеёиөүіюя]т sf:терің:0
SFX d 0 терің [әеёиөүіюя]ф sf:терің:0
SFX d 0 терің [әеёиөүіюя]х sf:терің:0
SFX d 0 терің [әеёиөүіюя]ц sf:терің:0
SFX d 0 терің [әеёиөүіюя]ч sf:терің:0
SFX d 0 терің [әеёиөүіюя]ш sf:терің:0
SFX d 0 терің [әеёиөүіюя]щ sf:терің:0
SFX E N 55
SFX E 0 іңіз [әеёиөүіюя]б sf:іңіз:0
SFX E 0 іңіз [әеёиөүіюя]в sf:іңіз:0
SFX E 0 іңіз [әеёиөүіюя]г sf:іңіз:0
SFX E 0 іңіз [әеёиөүіюя]ғ sf:іңіз:0
SFX E 0 іңіз [әеёиөүіюя]д sf:іңіз:0
SFX E 0 іңіз [әеёиөүіюя]ж sf:іңіз:0
SFX E 0 іңіз [әеёиөүіюя]з sf:іңіз:0
SFX E 0 іңіз [әеёиөүіюя]й sf:іңіз:0
SFX E 0 іңіз [әеёиөүіюя]к sf:іңіз:0
SFX E 0 іңіз [әеёиөүіюя]қ sf:іңіз:0
SFX E 0 іңіз [әеёиөүіюя]л sf:іңіз:0
SFX E 0 іңіз [әеёиөүіюя]м sf:іңіз:0
SFX E 0 іңіз [әеёиөүіюя]н sf:іңіз:0
SFX E 0 іңіз [әеёиөүіюя]ң sf:іңіз:0
SFX E 0 іңіз [әеёиөүіюя]һ sf:іңіз:0
SFX E 0 іңіз [әеёиөүіюя]п sf:іңіз:0
SFX E 0 іңіз [әеёиөүіюя]р sf:іңіз:0
SFX E 0 іңіз [әеёиөүіюя]с sf:іңіз:0
SFX E 0 іңіз [әеёиөүіюя]т sf:іңіз:0
SFX E 0 іңіз [әеёиөүіюя]у sf:іңіз:0
SFX E 0 іңіз [әеёиөүіюя]ф sf:іңіз:0
SFX E 0 іңіз [әеёиөүіюя]х sf:іңіз:0
SFX E 0 іңіз [әеёиөүіюя]ц sf:іңіз:0
SFX E 0 іңіз [әеёиөүіюя]ч sf:іңіз:0
SFX E 0 іңіз [әеёиөүіюя]ш sf:іңіз:0
SFX E 0 іңіз [әеёиөүіюя]щ sf:іңіз:0
SFX E 0 ңіз [әеёиөүіюя] sf:ңіз:0
SFX E 0 ңыз [аоұыэ] sf:ңыз:0
SFX E 0 ыңыз [аоуұыэ]б sf:ыңыз:0
SFX E 0 ыңыз [аоуұыэ]в sf:ыңыз:0
SFX E 0 ыңыз [аоуұыэ]г sf:ыңыз:0
SFX E 0 ыңыз [аоуұыэ]ғ sf:ыңыз:0
SFX E 0 ыңыз [аоуұыэ]д sf:ыңыз:0
SFX E 0 ыңыз [аоуұыэ]ж sf:ыңыз:0
SFX E 0 ыңыз [аоуұыэ]з sf:ыңыз:0
SFX E 0 ыңыз [аоуұыэ]й sf:ыңыз:0
SFX E 0 ыңыз [аоуұыэ]к sf:ыңыз:0
SFX E 0 ыңыз [аоуұыэ]қ sf:ыңыз:0
SFX E 0 ыңыз [аоуұыэ]л sf:ыңыз:0
SFX E 0 ыңыз [аоуұыэ]м sf:ыңыз:0
SFX E 0 ыңыз [аоуұыэ]н sf:ыңыз:0
SFX E 0 ыңыз [аоуұыэ]ң sf:ыңыз:0
SFX E 0 ыңыз [аоуұыэ]һ sf:ыңыз:0
SFX E 0 ыңыз [аоуұыэ]п sf:ыңыз:0
SFX E 0 ыңыз [аоуұыэ]р sf:ыңыз:0
SFX E 0 ыңыз [аоуұыэ]с sf:ыңыз:0
SFX E 0 ыңыз [аоуұыэ]т sf:ыңыз:0
SFX E 0 ыңыз [аоұыэ]у sf:ыңыз:0
SFX E 0 ыңыз [аоуұыэ]ф sf:ыңыз:0
SFX E 0 ыңыз [аоуұыэ]х sf:ыңыз:0
SFX E 0 ыңыз [аоуұыэ]ц sf:ыңыз:0
SFX E 0 ыңыз [аоуұыэ]ч sf:ыңыз:0
SFX E 0 ыңыз [аоуұыэ]ш sf:ыңыз:0
SFX E 0 ыңыз [аоуұыэ]щ sf:ыңыз:0
SFX E 0 ыңыз у sf:ыңыз:0
