hunspell/kk_KZ.modified.dic
азыңқы/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
айғайшыл/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
алмастырт/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
апаныкі/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
артынып/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
атауға/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
ауытқы/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
ақжелек/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
бажбалаң/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
банка/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
баулудағы/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
безнесмен/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
бестақа/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
болымсыз/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
бусант/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
біреулеп/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
бүтіндей/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
бұтал/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
бөп/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
гепард/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
дайындаған/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
деді/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
диспропорция/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
ділмар/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
дәріарша/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
елбектет/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
ережесіне/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
есікші/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
жазылмыш/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
жамаулы/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
жарысуы/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
жағына/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
жемтіктес/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
жобасыз/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
жылмаңдас/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
жүздес/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
жұртты/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
зейнеп/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
иждаңат/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
калория/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
кекете/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
керсен/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
кинотаным/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
коррупция/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
кітапшыла/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
күнкелді/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
кәр/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
көлбіре/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
көсемсөзші/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
леп/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
майтабан/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
мармелад/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
мегафон/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
меңгерт/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
мониторингі/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
мінгіздір/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
мұхитша/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
мөртабанымен/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
негізділігін/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
оазис/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
омақас/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
орфоэпия/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
оқшы/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
партстаж/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
полка/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
пұлсыз/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
редакцияла/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
рубайат/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
салта/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
саруар/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
сақталуын/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
сериялы/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
сойқы/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
стационар/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
сыйлас/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
сықпалан/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
сүрек/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
сөзуарлан/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
талдаудан/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
тарайтыны/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
таязда/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
тексіз/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
тиуашылықтен/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
тонал/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
тоғайшы/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
тротуар/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
тыпыршыт/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
тыңайт/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
тілінен/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
түйесораң/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
түргіздір/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
тұзсыз/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
тұтмаса/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
төбелендір/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
төңірегіндегі/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
фельетон/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
халықтары/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
шаймала/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
шапқыздырт/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
шақпыт/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
шешен/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
шормақ/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
шымдас/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
шілбиген/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
шәуңет/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
ыс/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
электровоз/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
ітуге/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
қаделе/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
қайталатқыз/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
қалтыр/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
қансы/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
қарақоғыр/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
қасамдас/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
қаулат/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
қақтал/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
қиындандыр/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
қолдануда/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
қорғал/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
қуаттауға/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
қылулар/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
қырқылжың/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
құйти/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
құржың/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
үйме/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
үркітіл/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
ұлтарма/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
ұят/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
әлдеқашанғы/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
әңгімеқумар/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
өрулі/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
Ескали/BbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
